Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Fire Prevention and Protection
227.336.
Findings — Correction of violations — Fees.

Whenever the state fire marshal or any deputy state fire marshal appointed or employed by him or her makes any finding set forth in subsection (1) of KRS

227.330

, or finds any property in violation of any provision of KRS

227.200

to

227.410

or any regulations adopted thereunder, in lieu of the order required in KRS

227.330

(1), he or she shall notify the owner or his or her agent in writing of such specific finding and violation and instruct him or her to correct the violation within a period of time not to exceed sixty (60) days. Should the owner fail to make the required corrections within the specified time, the state fire marshal may proceed to take any other action authorized in this chapter.

If the state fire marshal or a deputy state fire marshal is required to make additional inspections, beyond the initial inspection and one (1) follow-up inspection, to determine if the required corrections referred to in subsection (1) of this section have been made, the state fire marshal or the deputy state fire marshal shall assess a fee against the property owner to recover the cost of each additional inspection according to the following schedule:

Any fee collected under the provisions of this section by the state fire marshal shall be payable to the State Treasury and credited to the Division of Fire Prevention for the operation of the general inspection program. Any fee collected under the provisions of this section by a deputy state fire marshal shall be payable to the fire department conducting the inspection.

If during a follow-up inspection or any subsequent inspection for the same violation the state fire marshal or a deputy state fire marshal finds an additional violation not found during the initial inspection, such additional violation shall be treated as an initial violation which the property owner shall have the opportunity to correct under subsection (1) of this section prior to the assessment of a fee under subsection (2) of this section.

Third inspection fee $100.00 Fourth inspection fee $200.00 Fifth and subsequent inspection fee $500.00

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 305, § 22, effective June 17, 1978; 2003, ch. 125, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 24, § 400, effective July 15, 2010.

227.340.
Notice of hearing when property owner unknown.

Whenever the state fire marshal, his deputy, or other officer has reason to believe that a fire hazard should be corrected and he is unable to determine after a diligent search the owner of any property to be affected, he shall, in addition to notice required in KRS Chapter 13B, post notice of a hearing concerning the hazard in a conspicuous place on or near the property and shall also publish notice pursuant to KRS Chapter 424 in the county in which the property is located. The hearing shall be held in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B at the time and place specified in the notice as if the notice had been served on the owner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 15; 1966, ch. 239, § 171; 1978, ch. 305, § 13, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 318, § 144, effective July 15, 1996.

227.350.
Records of orders, rules, and regulations — Admissibility and presumptions as evidence.

The state fire marshal shall keep a permanent record of all summary orders, orders, rules, and regulations. Each such summary order, order, rule, or regulation shall be admissible in any prosecution for the violation of any of its provisions. Provisions of a summary order or an order, rule, or regulation shall be presumed to be lawful and to fix a reasonable and proper requirement and standard of safety from fire loss.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 16; 1978, ch. 305, § 14, effective June 17, 1978.

227.360.
Procedure in case of noncompliance with state fire marshal’s or fire inspector’s order.

If any owner fails to comply with a summary order or an order of the state fire marshal, his authorized designee or a fire inspector, or with an order as modified on appeal, the state fire marshal may cause the property to be repaired, or removed if repair is not feasible, or all fire hazard conditions remedied, at the expense of the owner. Such expense may be enforced against any property of such owner, and the state fire marshal and those employed by him to do the work or who furnish materials or equipment therefor, shall have a lien for such expense on the real estate property involved.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 17; 1978, ch. 305, § 15, effective June 17, 1978.

227.370.
Inspection of property by fire chief or other department personnel — Inspection and investigation reports.

The chief of the fire department of a city, or any officer or member of his department designated by him for that purpose, is authorized to inspect all property for the purpose of ascertaining and causing to be corrected any conditions likely to cause fire loss, or determining the cause or origin of any fire loss, or discovering any violation of a law or ordinance relating to fire prevention and protection. This authority shall apply to the interior of occupied, private dwellings only when a fire loss has occurred therein or when the officer has reason to believe that unsafe conditions exist in the building. Inspections of property in the territory served by the fire department shall be made as often as practicable or as often as the city legislative body may direct.

A written report of each inspection shall be made and kept on file in the office of the chief of the fire department. Reports of investigations of fire losses conducted by a fire department may, in the discretion of the chief of the fire department, be withheld from the public.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 18.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section would require the inspection officer to have reason to believe unsafe conditions exist in an occupied building before an inspection can be made, unless a fire was evident.

OAG 71-17

.

The reports of two (2) fires prepared by a fire chief following his investigations were validly withheld from the public pursuant to this section and KRS 61.878(1)(h).

OAG 84-19

.

Reports on the investigation of fires are exempt from mandatory disclosure under KRS

61.878

(1)(j) since reports of investigations of fire losses conducted by a fire department may, in the discretion of the chief of the fire department, be withheld from the public.

OAG 91-100

.

Denial of request for access to lists of fire and building code violations prepared by the chief, or his designee, and the city inspector, was improper as this section does not vest the chief with discretion to withhold information pertaining to violations noted in his inspection and thus subdivision (1)(j) of KRS

61.878

is inapplicable; moreover inspection reports are not “preliminary” within the meaning of KRS

61.878

(1)(h).

OAG 91-100

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Fire chief of second-class city to investigate fires and have control over fire department, KRS

95.500

.

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Notes, Firemen and the Fourth Amendment: What Are the Requirements of a Post-Fire Search?, 13 N. Ky. L. Rev. 153 (1986).

227.380.
Fire chief may order fire hazard removed — Appeal.

Whenever the chief of the fire department or any officer or member of his department designated by him for that purpose finds any property which, for want of repairs, lack of sufficient fire escapes, age, dilapidated condition, or any other cause, is especially liable to fire loss, or whenever an officer finds in any property, combustible or explosive matter or inflammable materials likely to result in fire loss, he shall order it to be remedied. The order shall forthwith be conformed to by the owner of the property.

The owner may appeal to the state fire marshal within ten (10) days following receipt of the order. The state fire marshal shall, upon appeal, conduct a hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 19; 1966, ch. 146, § 6; 1996, ch. 318, § 145, effective July 15, 1996.

227.390.
Officer may remedy fire hazard if owner fails to do so — Expense.

If any owner fails to comply with an order issued pursuant to KRS

227.380

or with an order as modified on appeal to the commissioner, the officer may cause the property to be repaired, or removed if repair is not feasible, and all fire hazard conditions remedied, at the expense of the owner. Such expense may be enforced against any property of such owners and the officer and those employed to do the work or who furnish materials or equipment therefor shall have a lien for such expense on the real estate or property involved.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 20; 2010, ch. 24, § 401, effective July 15, 2010.

227.395.
Class B firefighter foam — Restricted use during training or testing.

As used in this section:

“Class B firefighting foam” means foams designed for flammable liquid fires;

“PFAS chemicals” means perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances which, for the purpose of firefighting agents, is a class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one (1) fully fluorinated carbon atom; and

“Testing” means calibration testing, conformance testing, and fixed system testing.

Beginning on July 15, 2020, class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals shall not be used for firefighting training purposes or testing purposes unless otherwise required by law, regulation, or ordinance, and the testing facility has implemented best industry practices to prevent uncontrolled releases of class B firefighting foam in the environment. Violation of this subsection shall be subject to KRS

227.336

.

The restrictions in subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to:

The manufacture, sale, or distribution of class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals; or

The discharge or other use of class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals in emergency firefighting operations.

HISTORY:

2019 ch. 47, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

227.400.
Owner to keep property safe from fire — Public and employees to be kept out of unsafe buildings — Volunteers only to be used for private company’s employee fire brigade.

No owner shall fail to furnish and use reasonable adequate protection and safeguards against fire loss, or fail to adopt and use processes and methods reasonably adequate to render such places safe from fire loss.

No owner shall require or allow the public or any employee to go into or be in any property under his control which is not reasonably safe from the fire loss.

Private companies which use employees to form a fire brigade to fight fires at their plant or on the premises of the company shall use the employees for the fire brigade only if the employees volunteer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 201, § 21; 1994, ch. 414, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

227.410.
Definitions for KRS 227.410 — Prohibition of sale or installation of unventable type gas fuel room heaters — Exceptions — Enforcement.

As used in this section:

“Gas-fired heating device” means a gas burning appliance of either a gravity or mechanical circulation type, designed for the heating of air or of water in an enclosed structure;

“Gas-fired room heating device of the unventable type” means a self-contained, free standing, air heating, gas-fired appliance, designed as a space heater for an enclosed structure; and

“Enclosed structure” includes a room used for public assembly, educational, instructional, mercantile, office, or residential purposes (including manufactured homes, mobile homes, travel trailers, and houseboats).

No person, firm, or corporation shall sell at retail or wholesale, or offer or expose for sale at retail or wholesale any gas-fired room heating device of the unventable type, or other type which has not been approved as provided in KRS

234.175

, except unvented heaters that are built and sold solely for the curing of tobacco, which if sold or used by any person for any other purpose shall subject him or her to the penalty set forth in KRS

227.991

.

No person, firm, or corporation shall install in any room or enclosed structure any gas-fired room heating device of the unventable type or other type which has not been approved as provided in KRS

234.175

.

No person, firm, or corporation may install any gas-fired heating device of the ventable type for use in any room or enclosed structure unless said device is vented in accordance with the provisions of the standards of safety of the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.

No person, firm, or corporation who may own a gas-fired heating device of the unventable type or a gas-fired heating device of the ventable type, which has not been approved as provided in KRS

234.175

, or which does not conform to the provisions of the standards of safety of the department (all of which heating devices are referred to as “proscribed heaters” in this subsection and subsection (6) of this section), or who may occupy an enclosed structure in which such a proscribed heater is installed, shall continue to use or operate said proscribed heater after receipt of a written order described in subsection (6) of this section, and before the conditions contained in said order are met.

Cities with populations equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census or urban-county governments may under ordinance duly enacted appoint inspectors or officers who have power to issue written orders directing owners of heaters or occupants of structures in which heaters are installed, to discontinue the use or operation of a proscribed heater and to specify conditions which must be met before said proscribed heater may again be used or operated. Said order may be issued if said authorized person has actual knowledge of the existence of a proscribed heater, and, in the opinion of said authorized person, the continued use or operation of said proscribed heater would constitute a danger to life or health; provided however, no person, agency, firm, or corporation (other than the owner, user, seller, or installer of a proscribed heater) shall be liable for civil damages for his or her or its failure to recognize a proscribed heater, for failure to issue the order described in this subsection, for complying with said order, for assisting with the compliance therewith, or for allowing the continued use or operation of a proscribed heater prior to receipt of said order.

This section shall not apply to liquefied petroleum gas heaters subject to the jurisdiction of the department under KRS Chapter 234, except those liquefied petroleum gas heaters sold or installed for residential usage.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 96, §§ 1 to 4, 6; 1972, ch. 332, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(11); 1978, ch. 117, § 41, effective July 1, 1978; 1996, ch. 340, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 24, § 402, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 92, § 282, effective January 1, 2015.